Maryland, session 2025, HB1235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1235*

HOUSE BILL 1235
(q) “Dispensary” means an entity licensed under this title that acquires,
possesses, repackages, transports, sells, distributes, or dispenses cannabis or cannabis
products, including tinctures, aerosols, oils, and ointments, related supplies, and
educational materials for use by qualifying patients, caregivers, or consumers through a
storefront or through a delivery service, based on license type.
(dd) “Processor” means an entity licensed under this title that:
(1) transforms cannabis into another product or an extract and packages
and labels the cannabis product; and
(2) is authorized by the Administration to provide cannabis to cannabis
licensees and registered independent testing laboratories.
36–405.
(a) In this section, “unduly burden” includes imposing a zoning requirement or
restriction on the use of property by a cannabis licensee that is more restrictive than the
requirements established under § 36–410 of this subtitle.
(b) A political subdivision may:
(1) establish reasonable zoning requirements for cannabis businesses; and
(2) decide how to distribute its allocation of revenue under § 2–1302.2 of
the Tax – General Article.
(c) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A political subdivision may not:
[(1)] (I) establish zoning or other requirements that unduly burden a
cannabis licensee;
[(2)] (II) impose licensing, operating, or other fees or requirements on a
cannabis licensee that are disproportionately greater or more burdensome than those
imposed on other businesses with a similar impact on the area where the cannabis licensee
is located;
[(3)] (III) prohibit transportation through or deliveries within the political
subdivision by cannabis businesses located in other political subdivisions;
[(4)] (IV) prevent an entity whose license may be converted under §
36–401(b)(1)(ii) of this subtitle and that is in compliance with all relevant medical cannabis
regulations from being granted the license conversion; or

HOUSE BILL 1235 3
[(5)] (V) negotiate or enter into an agreement with a cannabis licensee or
an applicant for a cannabis license requiring that the cannabis licensee or applicant provide
money, donations, in–kind contributions, services, or anything of value to the political
subdivision.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY MAY NOT
ALLOW A CANNABIS PROCESSOR TO LOCATE WITHIN 1,000 FEET OF:
(I) A PRE–EXISTING PRIMARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL IN THE
COUNTY;
(II) A LICENSED CHILD CARE CENTER OR REGISTERED FAMILY
CHILD CARE HOME UNDER TITLE 9.5 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE THAT IS
LOCATED IN THE COUNTY; OR
(III) A PRE–EXISTING PLAYGROUND, RECREATION CENTER,
LIBRARY, PUBLIC PARK, OR PLACE OF WORSHIP IN THE COUNTY.
36–410.
(a) Beginning July 1, 2023, a cannabis licensee that is operating a dispensary
shall:
(1) ensure that it has adequate supply for qualifying patients and
caregivers;
(2) set aside operating hours or dedicated service lines to serve only
qualifying patients and caregivers; and
(3) ensure that at least 25% of cannabis and cannabis products in the
dispensary are from social equity licensees and growers and processors that do not share
common ownership with the dispensary.
(b) Except as provided in [subsection (d)] SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (E) of this
section, a licensed dispensary may not locate within:
(1) 500 feet of:
(i) a pre–existing primary or secondary school in the State, or a
licensed child care center or registered family child care home under Title 9.5 of the
Education Article; or
(ii) a pre–existing playground, recreation center, library, public
park, or place of worship; or
(2) 1,000 feet of another dispensary under this title.

HOUSE BILL 1235
(c) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, A LICENSED
DISPENSARY IN QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY MAY NOT LOCATE WITHIN 1,000 FEET OF:
(1) A PRE–EXISTING PRIMARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL IN THE
COUNTY;
(2) A LICENSED CHILD CARE CENTER OR REGISTERED FAMILY CHILD
CARE HOME UNDER TITLE 9.5 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE THAT IS LOCATED IN
THE COUNTY; OR
(3) A PRE–EXISTING PLAYGROUND, RECREATION CENTER, LIBRARY,
PUBLIC PARK, OR PLACE OF WORSHIP IN THE COUNTY.
(D) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a political
subdivision may adopt an ordinance reducing, but not increasing, the distance
requirements under [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (b) AND (C) of this section.
(2) A political subdivision may by ordinance increase the distance
limitation for dispensaries under subsection (b)(2) of this section to not more than one–half
mile.
[(d)] (E) The distance requirements under [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (b) AND
(C) of this section do not apply to a dispensary license that was:
(1) converted under § 36–401(b)(1)(ii) of this subtitle; and
(2) properly zoned and operating before July 1, 2023.
[(e)] (F) A political subdivision may not adopt an ordinance establishing zoning
requirements for licensed dispensaries that are more restrictive than zoning requirements
for a retail dealer licensed under this article.
[(f)] (G) A political subdivision may not adopt an ordinance:
(1) establishing a zoning requirement for a licensed grower cultivating
cannabis exclusively outdoors in an area zoned only for agricultural use that is more
restrictive than any zoning requirements that existed on June 30, 2023, governing a hemp
farm registered under Title 14 of the Agriculture Article in the political subdivision; or
(2) prohibiting outdoor cannabis cultivation on a premises that was
properly zoned for outdoor cannabis cultivation on or before June 30, 2023.
[(g)] (H) A political subdivision may:

HOUSE BILL 1235 5
(1) by ordinance, establish a distance limitation for dispensaries of up to
100 feet from an area zoned for residential use; or
(2) apply to dispensaries the distance limitation for licensed alcoholic
beverage retailers from an area zoned for residential use.
[(h)] (I) A political subdivision shall grant a waiver to an ordinance that
provides a distance requirement for dispensaries under this section for a licensed
dispensary that was in operation before April 1, 2024.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.